District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.13

Possession of self-defense sprays.

(a)

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 7-2501.01(7)(C), a person 18 years of age or older may possess and use a self-defense spray in the exercise of reasonable force in defense of the person or the person’s property only if it is propelled from an aerosol container, labeled with or accompanied by clearly written instructions as to its use, and dated to indicate its anticipated useful life.

(b)

No person shall possess a self-defense spray which is of a type other than that specified in §§ 7-2502.12 to 7-2502.14.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 213
as added Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-244, § 2, 40 DCR 647
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 10(b), 41 DCR 5193
1981 Ed., § 6-2323.